Oklahoma, session 2026, SB816.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2357.27A of Title 68, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Child” means an individual who is five (5) years of age or


younger;


2. “Child care expense” means the cost or tuition paid for


child care services from a licensed child care facility;


3. “Employee” means a person to whom wages or other


compensation is paid by an employer;

Req. No. 1058 Page 1


4. “Employer” means any sole proprietor or lawfully recognized


business entity engaged in lawful business activity;


5. “Licensed child care facility” means a person or entity


lawfully authorized to provide child care services in this state and


is enrolled in Oklahoma’s Quality Rating and Improvement System


(QRIS); and


6. “Qualified child care worker” means a person employed for at


least eight (8) consecutive months during the calendar year


corresponding to the tax year for which the credit authorized by


this section is claimed and who:


a. performs classroom services for a licensed child care


facility,


b. is enrolled in Oklahoma’s Professional Development


Ladder (PDL), and


c. has earned a minimum of twelve (12) credit hours.


B. For tax years 2026 through 2030, there shall be allowed as a


credit against the tax imposed pursuant to Section 2355 of Title 68


of the Oklahoma Statutes, an amount equal to:


1. Thirty percent (30%) of the amount expended by an employer


for an employee’s child care expenses;


2. Fifty percent (50%) of the amount expended by an employer


for the cost of operating or contracting to operate a child care


facility primarily used by dependents of the employees of the



Req. No. 1058 Page 2


employer or group of employers, minus any payments made by the


employees to the employer for those child care services;


3. Thirty percent (30%) of the amount expended by an employer


to contract with a child care facility to ensure a reservation for


its employees; or


4. Thirty percent (30%) of the amount expended by the employer


to construct, either through new construction or rehabilitation of a


structure, a facility located not more than two (2) miles from the


site at which employees perform primary work duties unless working


remotely, to provide child care services to the children of the


employees.


C. For tax years 2026 through 2030, there shall be allowed a


credit against the tax imposed pursuant to Section 2355 of Title 68


of the Oklahoma Statutes in the amount of One Thousand Dollars


($1,000.00) for a qualified child care worker. The credit


authorized pursuant to this subsection shall be refundable.


D. The total credit amount claimed by an employer pursuant to


the provisions of subsection B of this section shall not exceed


Thirty Thousand Dollars ($30,000.00) for any tax year.


E. The credit authorized pursuant to the provisions of


subsection B of this section shall not be used to reduce the income


tax liability of the taxpayer to less than zero (0).


F. If the amount of the credit allowed pursuant to subsection B


of this section exceeds the income tax liability, the amount of

Req. No. 1058 Page 3


credit not used in any tax year may be carried forward, in order, to


each of the five (5) subsequent tax years.


G. For tax year 2028 and subsequent tax years, the total amount


of credits authorized pursuant to subsection B of this section shall


be adjusted annually to limit the annual amount of credits to Five


Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00). The Oklahoma Tax Commission shall


annually calculate and publish a percentage by which the credits


authorized by this section shall be reduced so the total amount of


credits used to offset tax does not exceed the annual limit. The


formula to be used for the percentage adjustment shall be Five


Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00) divided by the amount of credit


claimed in the second preceding tax year. In the event the total


tax credits authorized by this section exceed the annual limit in


any tax year, the Tax Commission shall permit any excess but shall


factor such excess into the percentage adjustment formula for


subsequent tax years.


H. For tax year 2028 and subsequent tax years, the total amount


of credits authorized pursuant to subsection B of this section shall


be adjusted annually to limit the annual amount of credits to


Fourteen Million Dollars ($14,000,000.00). The Tax Commission shall


annually calculate and publish a percentage by which the credits


authorized by this section shall be reduced so the total amount of


credits used to offset tax does not exceed the annual limit. The


formula to be used for the percentage adjustment shall be Fourteen

Req. No. 1058 Page 4


Million Dollars ($14,000,000.00) divided by the amount of credit


claimed in the second preceding tax year. In the event the total


tax credits authorized by this section exceed the annual limit in


any tax year, the Tax Commission shall permit any excess but shall


factor such excess into the percentage adjustment formula for


subsequent tax years.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1058 QD 1/19/2025 5:44:01 AM































Req. No. 1058 Page 5